District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0015.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Quasi-Governmental Affordable Housing Production Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. An Act Authorizing the sale of certain real estate in the District of Columbia no
longer required for public purposes, approved August 5, 1939 (53 Stat. 1211; D.C. Official Code
§ 10-801 et seq.), is amended by adding a new section 801a to read as follows:
“Sec. 801a. Disposition of real property by an instrumentality of the District.
“(a) If a proposed disposition of real property by an instrumentality of the District
government will result in the development of multifamily residential property consisting of 10 or
more units, the affordable-housing requirements outlined in section 801(b-3) shall apply.


“(b) For the purpose of this subsection, the term “instrumentality” means a quasi-
governmental entity that operates in part with District funds, including:
“(1) The District of Columbia Water and Sewer Authority, established by section
202(a) of the Water and Sewer Authority Establishment and Department of Public Works
Reorganization Act of 1996, effective April 18, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-111; D.C. Code § 43-
1672(a));
“(2) The Health and Hospitals Public Benefits Corporation, established by section
202(a) of the Health and Hospitals Public Benefit Corporation Act of 1996, effective April 9,
1997 (D.C. Law 11-212; D.C. Code § 32-261.1 et seq.);
“(3) The Public Service Commission, established by paragraph 97(a) of section 8
of An Act Making appropriations to provide for the expenses of the government of the District of
Columbia for the fiscal year ending June thirtieth nineteen hundred and fourteen, and for other
purposes, approved March 4, 1913 (37 Stat. 995; D.C. Code § 43-401);
“(4) The Washington Convention Center Authority established by section 202 of
the Washington Convention Center Authority Act of 1994, effective September 28, 1994 (D.C.
Law 10-188; D.C. Code § 9-805);
“(5) The District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency established by section
201 of the District of Columbia Housing Finance Agency Act, effective March 3, 1979 (D.C.
Law 2-135; D.C. Code § 42-2701.01 et seq.); and
“(6) The Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority Compact, approved
September 15, 1960 (D.C. Code § 1-2431 et seq.).
“(7) The District of Columbia Housing Authority, established by Chapter 2 of
Title 6.”.


Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.